Massachusetts, session 194th, H5289.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 81 of the acts of 2010, as amended by section 1 of
chapter 397 of the acts of 2014, is here by further amended by striking out the first sentence and
inserting in place thereof the following sentence:- The general manager of the town of Norwood
may appoint, as they deem necessary, retired police officers for the purpose of performing police
details or any other police duties arising therefrom or during the course of police detail work,
whether or not related to the detail work; provided, however, that such retired police officers
shall have been regular police officers who retired in good standing from a Massachusetts
community based upon superannuation. Special police officers appointed pursuant to this act
shall comply with all requirements of chapter 6E of the General Laws, including: (i) maintaining
certification and good standing with the Massachusetts Peace Officer Standards and Training
Commission; and (ii) complying with all annual in-service and other training requirements
mandated by the municipal police training committee.
of 1